California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) In determining the boundaries of the district, the board of supervisors shall exclude from the district any winegrape growing acreage that it finds will not be benefited by the proposed project, and it may include in the district any winegrape growing acreage that it finds will be benefited if it also finds it will be in the interest of the district to include that winegrape growing acreage. The inclusion may be upon application of the owner or, without the owner’s application, upon giving the owner notice of the proposed inclusion and an opportunity for a hearing on the inclusion.

(b) Notice of inclusion shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the clerk of the board of supervisors, to the address of the owner of the winegrape growing acreage, as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll, and to any person that has filed with the clerk that person’s name and address and description of winegrape growing acreage in which he or she has either a legal or equitable interest. The notice shall describe the winegrape growing acreage proposed to be included, and shall state the time and place at which objections to the inclusion will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Organization of Districts [6294. - 6294.7.]

6294.

Upon the adoption of the order of organization, the board of supervisors shall immediately appoint a board of directors of five members to administer the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.1.

In order to be eligible to be a director of the district, a person shall be a citizen of the United States and of this state, and an owner of lands included in the district that are devoted, in whole or in part, to the growing of winegrapes. The district board members shall represent geographically diverse areas in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.2.

Upon his or her appointment, each director shall, in the manner provided by law, subscribe the oath of office and file the oath with the county clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.3.

(a) From and after the filing for record of the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district organized, and the appointment and qualification of its first board of directors, the organization of the district is complete. The district shall operate for a period of five years from the date of its organization and shall cease to exist after five years, unless the district is reauthorized and approved by the board of supervisors.

(b) The district board of directors shall hold a public hearing six months prior to the termination of its initial organization or last reauthorization to determine whether the conditions of Pierce’s disease, the glassy-winged sharpshooter or other pest or disease determined pursuant to Section 6293.4 warrant the reauthorization of the district for an additional five years. The notice of hearing shall state the name of the district and that consideration is being given to reauthorizing the district for up to an additional five years, the boundaries of the district, and the time and place for the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Sections 6293.7 and 6293.8. The district board of directors shall submit the record of the hearing and its recommendation to the board of supervisors within 90 days of the hearing.

(c) Following its receipt of the recommendation of the district board of directors, the board of supervisors shall approve or reject the recommendation. If the recommendation is rejected, the board of supervisors shall return the report accompanied by its reasons for the rejection to the board of directors within 30 days of receipt. The district board of directors may thereafter address the reasons for rejection by the board of supervisors and submit an amended report and new recommendations for reauthorization for approval or rejection by the board of supervisors, unless the district has ceased to exist pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.4.

(a) Immediately after the organization of the district, the directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson and secretary from among their own number.

(b) The chairperson shall call and preside at all meetings of the district board, sign all warrants drawn on the county treasurer, and all contracts and other documents, and the minutes of all meetings at which the chairperson is present. In case of the chairperson’s absence from a meeting, the vice chairperson shall act as chairperson pro tempore. The vice chairperson may sign warrants in place of the chairperson if the chairperson is absent from a meeting or unavailable. The secretary shall give notice of and keep the minutes of all meetings and prepare and have custody of all records and papers, and have custody of the seal of the district. The secretary shall attest all warrants drawn on the county treasury, all contracts and other documents, and shall sign the minutes of all meetings at which he or she is present. The secretary shall prepare the annual reports and any other reports required by the district board and shall prepare all notices and all calls for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.5.

The members of the district board shall serve for terms of one year, or for a longer term as determined by the board of supervisors, and until the appointment and qualification of their successors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.6.

Upon the expiration of the term of any member of the district board, the board of supervisors shall appoint the successor. Vacancies shall be filled by the board of supervisors for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6294.7.

The members of the district board shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, when claims for those expenses have been approved by the district board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the District [6295. - 6295.6.]

6295.

The district may do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease, or otherwise, and hold, use and enjoy, and lease, or otherwise dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and description within or without the district necessary to the full and convenient exercise of its powers.

(d) Cause assessments to be levied, as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 6296), to pay any obligation of the district and to accomplish the purposes of the district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(e) Make contracts, and employ, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all persons, firms, and corporations necessary to carry out the purposes and the powers of the district, and at any salary, wage, or other compensation as the district board of directors shall determine.

(f) Respond to the effects and spread of Pierce’s disease, the glassy-winged sharpshooter, and other winegrape plant pests and diseases and collect and disseminate to winegrape growers in the district all relevant information and scientific studies concerning the pest or pests or diseases, as well as to chart and determine the extent and location of any infestations.

(g) With reasonable advance notice in writing to the landowner, as determined by the district, enter into or upon any land included within the boundaries of the district for the purpose of inspecting the winegrape plants and any other host plants and fruit growing on them.

(h) Perform any and all acts, either within or outside the district, necessary or proper to fully and completely carry out the purposes for which the district is organized.

(i) The district’s administrative costs are to be limited to 5 percent of the annual assessment revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.1.

Every district formed pursuant to this chapter has all of the powers prescribed by Section 6295 and other provisions of this chapter, regardless of any language in the petition for formation for any district or in any of the proceedings leading to the formation that would otherwise limit the power of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.2.

The county agricultural commissioner of the county in which the district is located shall, in consultation with the district board, assist the district to the extent possible in all activities undertaken by the district for the control of Pierce’s disease, the glassy-winged sharpshooter, or any other winegrape plant pests or diseases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.3.

The district board shall, immediately after its appointment and after public hearing, formulate an effective plan and adopt a budget of expenditures for the forthcoming fiscal year. At a public hearing on the plan and the budget, any owner of winegrape growing acreage included in the district may make written or oral protest against the budget or any item in it. The plan and the budget, as thereafter approved by the district board, shall be the plan and the budget of the district for the forthcoming fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.4.

There may be added to the budget for the first fiscal year of the operation of the district an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the total amount of the budget to cover the preliminary expenses of the district, including, but not limited to, the costs of formation, before the beginning of the first fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.5.

For each fiscal year subsequent to the first year of operation of the district, the district board shall adopt the final budget therefor in the same manner and at the same time that the budget for the first fiscal year was adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6295.6.

The board of supervisors may charge the district for actual costs incurred by the county in connection with the proceedings for the formation of the district, and the district shall reimburse the county from assessments levied for those expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Levy of Assessments for District Purposes [6296. - 6296.9.]

6296.

The county assessor, in making the annual assessment of property included in the district each and every year after the organization of the district, shall identify any parcel of real property with one acre, or more, of winegrape plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.1.

Whenever acreage within the district is planted with winegrape plants in such a fashion as to qualify as winegrape growing acreage, the acreage is subject to assessment as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.2.

(a) After the district has been formed, an owner of winegrape growing acreage in the district may present to the district board a request in writing for the exclusion of that land or any part of the land from the district upon a showing that the land or part of the land will not be benefited by the activities of the district. Factors that the district board may consider in its determination for exclusion shall include an affidavit from the owner that the plants have been removed from the land and will not be replanted within the foreseeable future. However, should the excluded land be planted to winegrapes, the landowner shall be required to inform the district, in writing, within 30 days of planting.

(b) After receipt of the request, the district board shall cause an investigation of the parcel of land to be made and, if the district board determines that the land or part of the land will not be benefited by the activities of the district, the district board shall exclude the winegrape acreage from the district and immediately certify this fact to the county assessor and the county auditor or tax collector.

(c) Any owner of winegrape acreage outside of, or otherwise not included in, the district may present to the district board a request in writing for inclusion of the land in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.3.

(a) The district board shall, on or before the first Monday in April of each year, file with the board of supervisors a budget that sets forth all estimated expenditures of the district for the fiscal year commencing on the first day of July. A copy of the budget shall also, at the same time, be filed with the auditor of the county. The board of supervisors shall cause to be prepared and filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors a written report that contains all of the following information:

(1) A description of each parcel of property proposed to be subject to the assessment.

(2) The amount of the assessment of each parcel for the initial fiscal year.

(3) The maximum amount of the assessment that may be levied for each parcel during any fiscal year.

(4) The duration of the assessment.

(5) The basis of the assessment.

(6) The schedule of the assessment.

(7) A description specifying the requirements for written and oral protest, and the protest threshold necessary for requiring abandonment of the proposed assessment pursuant to Section 6299.

(b) The board of supervisors may, by ordinance or by resolution, adopted after complying with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 53750) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and upon approval by two-thirds of the benefiting vineyard property owners, determine and levy an assessment for winegrape pest and disease control activities for any of the following purposes:

(1) Responding to, managing, and controlling the effects of the spread of Pierce’s disease, the glassy-winged sharpshooter, and any other pests that attack winegrape plants.

(2) Collecting and disseminating to winegrape producers in the district all relevant information and scientific studies concerning the pest, or pests, and winegrape diseases.

(3) Charting and determining the extent and location of any infestations.

(c) The annual assessment shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20) per planted acre.

(d) (1) The district board may establish zones or areas of benefit within the district, and may restrict the imposition of assessments to areas lying within one or more of the zones or areas of benefit established within the district.

(2) The assessment shall be levied on each parcel planted with winegrape plants in such a fashion as to qualify as winegrape growing acreage within the boundaries of the district, zone, or area of benefit.

(e) In addition, the mailed notice shall include the name of the district, the return address of the sender, the amount of the assessment for the initial fiscal year, the maximum amount of the assessment that may be levied during any fiscal year and the name and telephone number of the person designated by the board of supervisors to answer inquiries regarding the protest proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.5.

The assessment so levied shall be computed and entered upon the assessment roll by the county auditor, and if the supervisors fail to levy the assessment as required, the auditor shall do so. The assessment shall be collected at the same time, and in the same manner as, and together with and not separate from, general county taxes, and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.6.

The general provisions of the laws of this state, prescribing the manner of levying and collecting county taxes and the duties of the several county officers with respect to levying and collecting county taxes, are, so far as they are applicable and not in conflict with the specific provisions of this article, hereby adopted and made a part of this article. The several county officers thus referred to shall be liable upon their several official bonds for the faithful discharge of the duties imposed upon them by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.7.

The revenue from the assessments imposed pursuant to this chapter by the district are trust funds and shall be encumbered only for the purposes for which the district is formed and for the benefit of the property assessed. The district shall expend the minimum amount necessary for overhead and other administrative costs. No district funds shall be donated, loaned, or transferred to any other local agency or to the State of California for any purpose, except for the implementation of the duties of the district, set forth under this chapter, as determined necessary by the district board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.8.

The county treasury shall be the repository of all the moneys of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for all those moneys, and place the same to the credit of the district. The county treasurer shall be responsible upon his or her official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement, in the manner provided in this article, of all moneys of the district so held.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6296.9.

(a) The county treasurer shall pay out money of the district only upon warrants of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of directors of the district signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson and attested to by the secretary. The county treasurer, with the approval of the board of supervisors, shall pay out the money of the district upon one master warrant of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of directors of the district and signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson and attested to by the secretary, to meet the district’s expenses, including salaries, at such intervals as is approved by the board of supervisors.

(b) The county treasurer shall report, in writing, on the first day of July, October, January, and March of each year, to the district board of directors, the amount of money the treasurer then holds for the district, the amount of receipts since the last report, and the amounts paid out. Each report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the district to whom it is addressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Inclusion of Lands [6297. - 6297.]

6297.

Lands devoted exclusively to the growing of winegrapes within a tract of land outside the district, but in the county in which the district is located, may be annexed to the district in the same manner provided in this chapter for the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Consolidation [6298. - 6298.]

6298.

Any two or more districts organized or existing under this chapter may be consolidated, whether or not the boundaries are coterminous.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dissolution of Districts [6299. - 6299.]

6299.

Upon the filing of a petition with the board of supervisors, signed by 50 percent or more of the owners of 65 percent or more of the affected land, or signed by 65 percent or more of the owners of 50 percent or more of the affected land, requesting the dissolution of the district, the board of supervisors shall set a time and place for hearing on the petition, which shall not be less than 20 days, or more than 40 days, after the filing of the petition. Immediately following the hearing, the board of supervisors shall vote on the petition for dissolution. A majority vote supporting the petition by the supervisors will result in dissolution of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SHIPMENTS [6301. - 6524.]



  CHAPTER 1. Generally [6301. - 6344.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6301. - 6306.]

6301.

If any article is found to have been transported into this state from any other country or state, or territory or district of the United States, in violation of any provision of a quarantine that is established by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, the article is subject to seizure, destruction, or other disposition to the same extent and in the same manner as if the article had originated in this state and was in violation of a provision of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 157, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.1.

(a) The secretary shall adopt, by reference, by regulation, those federal quarantine regulations and any subsequent amendments in Parts 301 to 369, inclusive, of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Civil and criminal penalties applicable to a violation of those federal quarantine regulations may be imposed by the secretary and other duly authorized plant quarantine officers in conformity with that other law.

(b) Any funds recovered by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the county general fund in the county in which the action is brought and shall be allocated to the commissioner to cover costs related to the enforcement of this division. Any funds recovered by the secretary pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to cover costs related to the enforcement of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 157, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

If any shipment of plants or things which is passing through any portion of the state is, or is liable to be, infested or infected with any pest, and there exists danger of dissemination of the pest while the shipment is in transit in this state, the shipment shall be placed within sealed containers which are composed of metal or other material so constructed that they are not liable to be broken or opened while in transit so as to permit the pest to escape. The containers shall not be opened while within the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, except under written permission from a plant quarantine officer or under his specific direction, to move any lot or shipment of plants or other things to which a warning tag or notice has been affixed pursuant to this division, or to remove, alter, destroy, deface, or mutilate any such warning tag or notice.

(b) If any shipment of plants or things is allowed to transit the state or transit to a given destination county under a quarantine warning-hold notice, the shipment of plants or things shall not be diverted to another destination without the written permission of the director or the commissioner of the destination county.

(c) Diversion of a shipment as described in subdivision (b) is unlawful.

(d) If a shipment of plants or things requires a state or county plant quarantine officer to be present at the destination to supervise the unloading, inspection, or treatment of a quarantine shipment, the director or commissioner, as the case may be, may charge the shipper or receiver a service fee for the cost of the services. Service fees shall be determined based on the director or commissioner’s costs for the services rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1056, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

It is unlawful for any person to import into the state any English or Australian wild rabbit, flying fox, mongoose, or any other form of animal life which is detrimental to agriculture. Any such animal shall be refused entry and shall be immediately destroyed or shipped out of the state within 48 hours at the option and expense of the owner or bailee of the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6305.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully import into, or ship or transport within, the state any live insect or any pest as such, unless the shipment or transportation and subsequent use and handling is authorized prior to shipment under written permit and the regulations of the director or the United States Department of Agriculture, except the following:

(a) Honey bees of the species of Apis mellifera.

(b) Weeds for the purpose of identification.

(c) Beneficial or useful insects of common occurrence in the state.

(d) Insects or other organisms of public health or animal health interest, which are not plant pests, when imported, shipped, or transported by any governmental public health agency.

Any shipment which is not authorized by this section shall be immediately destroyed unless it is determined by the inspecting officer that the nature of the contents of the shipment is such that no damage can be caused to agriculture in this state through its shipment out of the state or return of the shipment to the point of origin. In such case, the shipment out of the state or the return of the shipment to point of origin shall be allowed at the expense of the owner or bailee of the shipment within the time which is specified by the inspecting officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 446.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.

Unless otherwise permitted by law, any person who willfully and knowingly imports into, or who willfully and knowingly transports or ships within, this state, a Mediterranean fruit fly is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   Effective June 22, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tephritidae Fruit Flies [6321. - 6323.]

6321.

It is unlawful for any person to import into, or transport thereafter within, the state any plant, fruit, or vegetable which is known to be, or may become, a host of any species of the fruit fly family Tephritidae from any territory, state, or district where such species of Tephritidae is known to exist except under permit and regulation of the director if the director finds that the species is harmless to agriculture or that an effective treatment of the hosts eliminates fruit fly risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.

Any plant, fruit, or vegetable which is known to be, or which may become, a host of any species of the fruit fly family Tephritidae, together with its containers and packing, shall be refused entry or transportation within the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6323.

Any plant, fruit, or vegetable which is known to be, or which may become, a host of any species of the fruit fly Tephritidae, which is imported into, or transported thereafter within, this state shall be immediately destroyed at the expense of the owner or bailee unless it is imported or transported under permit and in accordance with regulations of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Seed Pests in Shipments [6341. - 6344.]

6341.

If anything brought into any county or locality of the state from another county or locality within the state, or from any other state or foreign country, is found to be infested with the seed or propagule of any pest that is not of common occurrence in the county or locality into which the shipment is brought, the director or the commissioner shall notify the owner or bailee of such shipment to return it to the point from which the shipment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

6342.

The owner or bailee shall return the shipment to the point from which it was made within 48 hours.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6343.

If the director or the commissioner determines that the pest seeds can be destroyed by treatment, the shipment may, at the option and expense of the owner or bailee, be given such treatment under the supervision of the director or the commissioner. After the treatment the shipment may be released.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6344.

If the director or the commissioner determines that no adverse effect to agriculture would result from allowing the shipment to be stored in quarantine pending treatment or shipment out of the state, or from procedures incidental thereto, the shipment may be so stored for such a period of time in an approved place under such conditions as the director or commissioner may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Interstate Shipments [6401. - 6465.]



  ARTICLE 1. Notice of Arrival and Hold for Inspection [6401. - 6405.]

6401.

It is unlawful for any person to transport, receive, or import into the state any plant or any thing against which a quarantine has been established, or any plant, unless he does both of the following:

(a) Notifies the director or the commissioner of the county in which the plant or thing is received, of the arrival of the plant or thing immediately after its arrival.

(b) Holds the plant, or thing for immediate inspection by the director or commissioner, without unnecessarily moving it, or placing it where it may be harmful.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

If there is no commissioner in the county where the plant or thing is received, the person that transports, receives, or imports the plant or thing into the state shall notify the director, who shall make immediate arrangements for its inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

The officer who makes the inspection may enter at any time into any conveyance or place within the state where the plant or thing is located to ascertain whether it is, or is liable to be, infested or infected with any pest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

The secretary may enter into agreements with the regulatory officials of other states or the United States Department of Agriculture to provide for the application of various pest risk mitigation measures
 to the shipments of plants or bee colonies at the place of origin. Shipments entering the state in compliance with these agreements may be released upon arrival at ports of entry or terminals in this state without being held and inspected for compliance with standards and quarantine requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 301, Sec. 1.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

(a) Any certificate that has been altered, defaced, or improperly completed or changed is void.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(1) Alter, deface, or otherwise falsify or change, a certificate that is attached to any plant shipment or other thing entering the state.

(2) Use, or have in his or her possession, any certificate that has been altered, defaced, or otherwise falsified or changed.

(3) Transport, receive, or possess any plant material represented by a certificate.

(c) For purposes of this section, “certificate” means a certificate issued pursuant to a quarantine regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 149, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Markings [6421. - 6421.]

6421.

Each shipment of plants which is brought into this state shall have legibly marked upon it in a conspicuous manner and place all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the shipper or owner.

(b) The name of the person to whom the shipment is forwarded or shipped or the name of his agent.

(c) The name of the country, state, or territory where the contents were grown.

(d) A statement of its contents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pest Findings [6441. - 6443.]

6441.

If, after inspection, any plant or thing is found to be infested or infected, the owner or bailee shall, at his expense, disinfect the conveyance or place where the plant or thing may have been located, in such manner as to destroy all infection or infestation present, or that is liable to be present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6442.

The officer who makes the inspection shall not permit any article to be removed which has come in contact with the infested or infected plant or thing, if such article might convey infection or infestation, until after the infection or infestation is destroyed, except for the purpose of destruction or disinfection under the supervision of the inspecting officer.

Any article which is liable to be infested or infected shall be held until it has been thoroughly disinfected and the pest has been destroyed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6443.

The director may designate certain plants that are not for planting, propagation, or ornamental purposes within this state, which are arriving from certain areas, to be plants that may be released without inspection, if he finds, upon investigation, that such plants from such areas are not liable to cause the introduction of pests into this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Abatement, Reshipment, or Treatment [6461. - 6465.]

6461.

It is unlawful to ship or transport any plant or any other thing into this state which is infested with any pest which has been listed, by the director, as detrimental to agriculture in this state.

The director shall either establish and amend the list of pests by order, after notice and opportunity for written or oral comments, or through the adoption or amendment of quarantine regulations.

In addition to the civil, criminal, and administrative remedies specified in this division, the director may, after notice and opportunity to respond, impose inspection, treatment, certification, holding, or other requirements for any shipper or transporter that has shipped or transported three or more pest-infested shipments into this state within any 12-month period.

With regard to any commercial shipment violating any of those requirements imposed pursuant to this section, the director or commissioner may also charge the shipper or transporter the cost of inspecting and controlling the pest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6461.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, if any shipment of plants or any other things in violation of this chapter or any quarantine which has been established, is brought into this state and it is found to be infested or infected, or there is reasonable cause to believe that it may be infested or infected, with any pest, the shipment shall be immediately destroyed by, or under the supervision of, the officer who inspects it, at the expense of the owner or bailee of the shipment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6461 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6462.

If the nature of the pest is such that no detriment can be caused to agriculture in the state by the shipment of the plant or thing out of the state, the officer who makes the inspection may affix a warning tag or notice to the shipment. The officer shall notify the owner or bailee of the plant or thing to ship it out of the state within 48 hours. The owner or bailee shall ship the plant or thing out of the state within the time which is specified in the notice. The shipment is under the direction and control of the officer who makes the inspection and is at the expense of the owner or bailee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6463.

If the plant or thing is not shipped out of the state within the time which is specified in the notice, the inspecting officer shall immediately after the expiration of the time seize the plant or thing and destroy it at the expense of the owner or bailee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6464.

If the pest may be exterminated by treatment or processing which is prescribed by the director and it is determined by the inspecting officer that the nature of the pest is such that no damage can be caused to agriculture in this state through such treatment or processing or any procedure which is incidental thereto, the shipment may be treated or processed under the supervision of the inspecting officer at the expense of the owner or bailee in the manner, and within the time, which is specified by the inspecting officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6465.

If, after the treatment or processing, the inspecting officer determines that the pest has been exterminated, the shipment may be released.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Intrastate Shipments [6501. - 6524.]



  ARTICLE 1. Notice of Arrival and Hold for Inspection [6501. - 6506.]

6501.
